Illinois, session 104th, SB1674.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 5Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by changing Section 62605-485 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2605/2605-485)8    Sec. 2605-485. Endangered Missing Person Advisory.9    (a) A coordinated program known as the Endangered Missing 10Person Advisory is established within the Illinois State 11Police. The purpose of the Endangered Missing Person Advisory 12is to provide a regional system for the rapid dissemination of 13information regarding a missing person who is believed to be a 14high-risk missing person as defined in Section 10 of the 15Missing Persons Identification Act.16    (b) The AMBER Plan Task Force, established under Section 172605-480 of this Law, shall serve as the task force for the 18Endangered Missing Person Advisory. The AMBER Plan Task Force 19shall monitor and review the implementation and operation of 20the regional system developed under subsection (a), including 21procedures, budgetary requirements, and response protocols. 22The AMBER Plan Task Force shall also develop additional 23network resources for use in the system.  SB1674- 2 -LRB104 11983 RTM 22077 b1    (c) The Illinois State Police, in coordination with the 2Illinois Department on Aging, shall develop and implement a 3community outreach program to promote awareness among the 4State's healthcare facilities, nursing homes, assisted living 5facilities, and other senior centers. The guidelines and 6procedures shall ensure that specific health information about 7the missing person is not made public through the alert or 8otherwise.9    (c-5) Subject to appropriation, the Illinois State Police, 10in coordination with the Illinois Department of Human 11Services, shall develop and implement a community outreach 12program to promote awareness of the Endangered Missing Person 13Advisory among applicable entities, including, but not limited 14to, developmental disability facilities as defined in Section 151-107 of the Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities 16Code. The guidelines and procedures shall ensure that specific 17health information about the missing person is not made public 18through the alert or otherwise. 19    (d) The Child Safety Coordinator, created under Section 202605-480 of this Law, shall act in the dual capacity of Child 21Safety Coordinator and Endangered Missing Person Coordinator. 22The Coordinator shall assist in the establishment of State 23standards and monitor the availability of federal funding that 24may become available to further the objectives of the 25Endangered Missing Person Advisory. The Illinois State Police 26shall provide technical assistance for the Coordinator from   SB1674- 3 -LRB104 11983 RTM 22077 b1its existing resources.2    (e)(1) The Illinois State Police, in cooperation with the 3Silver Search Task Force, shall develop as part of the 4Endangered Missing Person Advisory a coordinated statewide 5awareness program and toolkit to be used when a person 21 years 6of age or older who is believed to have Alzheimer's disease, 7other related dementia, or other dementia-like cognitive 8impairment is reported missing, which shall be referred to as 9Silver Search.10    (2) The Illinois State Police shall complete development 11and deployment of the Silver Search Awareness Program and 12toolkit on or before July 1, 2017.13    (3) The Illinois State Police shall establish a Silver 14Search Task Force within 90 days after the effective date of 15this amendatory Act of the 99th General Assembly to assist the 16Illinois State Police in development and deployment of the 17Silver Search Awareness Program and toolkit. The Task Force 18shall establish the criteria and create a toolkit, which may 19include usage of Department of Transportation signs, under 20Section 2705-505.6 of the Department of Transportation Law of 21the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. The Task Force 22shall monitor and review the implementation and operation of 23that program, including procedures, budgetary requirements, 24standards, and minimum requirements for the training of law 25enforcement personnel on how to interact appropriately and 26effectively with individuals that suffer from Alzheimer's   SB1674- 4 -LRB104 11983 RTM 22077 b1disease, other dementia, or other dementia-like cognitive 2impairment. The Task Force shall also develop additional 3network and financial resources for use in the system. The 4Task Force shall include, but is not limited to, one 5representative from each of the following:6        (A) the Illinois State Police;7        (B) the Department on Aging;8        (C) the Department of Public Health;9        (D) the Illinois Law Enforcement Training Standards 10    Board;11        (E) the Illinois Emergency Management Agency and 12    Office of Homeland Security;13        (F) the Secretary of State;14        (G) the Department of Transportation; 15        (H) the Department of the Lottery;16        (I) the Illinois Toll Highway Authority; 17        (J) a State association dedicated to Alzheimer's care, 18    support, and research;19        (K) a State association dedicated to improving quality 20    of life for persons age 50 and over;21        (L) a State group of area agencies involved in 22    planning and coordinating services and programs for older 23    persons in their respective areas;24        (M) a State organization dedicated to enhancing 25    communication and cooperation between sheriffs;26        (N) a State association of police chiefs and other   SB1674- 5 -LRB104 11983 RTM 22077 b1    leaders of police and public safety organizations;2        (O) a State association representing Illinois 3    publishers; 4        (P) a State association that advocates for the 5    broadcast industry; 6        (Q) a member of a large wireless telephone carrier; 7    and8        (R) a member of a small wireless telephone carrier. 9    The members of the Task Force designated in subparagraphs 10(A) through (I) of this paragraph (3) shall be appointed by the 11head of the respective agency. The members of the Task Force 12designated in subparagraphs (J) through (R) of this paragraph 13(3) shall be appointed by the Director of the Illinois State 14Police. The Director of the Illinois State Police or the 15Director's his or her designee shall serve as Chair of the Task 16Force. 17    The Task Force shall meet at least twice a year and shall 18provide a report on the operations of the Silver Search 19Program to the General Assembly and the Governor each year by 20June 30.21    (4) Subject to appropriation, the Illinois State Police, 22in coordination with the Department on Aging and the Silver 23Search Task Force, shall develop and implement a community 24outreach program to promote awareness of the Silver Search 25Program as part of the Endangered Missing Person Advisory 26among law enforcement agencies, the State's healthcare   SB1674- 6 -LRB104 11983 RTM 22077 b1facilities, nursing homes, assisted living facilities, other 2senior centers, and the general population on or before 3January 1, 2017.4    (5) The Child Safety Coordinator, created under Section 52605-480 of this Law, shall act in the capacity of Child Safety 6Coordinator, Endangered Missing Person Coordinator, and Silver 7Search Program Coordinator. The Coordinator, in conjunction 8with the members of the Task Force, shall assist the Illinois 9State Police and the Silver Search Task Force in the 10establishment of State standards and monitor the availability 11of federal and private funding that may become available to 12further the objectives of the Endangered Missing Person 13Advisory and Silver Search Awareness Program. The Illinois 14State Police shall provide technical assistance for the 15Coordinator from its existing resources. 16    (6) The Illinois State Police shall provide administrative 17and other support to the Task Force. 18    (f)(1) The Illinois State Police, in cooperation with the 19Green Alert Task Force, shall develop as part of the 20Endangered Missing Person Advisory a coordinated statewide 21awareness program and toolkit, which shall be referred to as a 22Green Alert, to be used when a veteran, active service member, 23Illinois National Guard Member, or reservist is believed to be 24missing or at risk. 25    (2) The Illinois State Police shall complete development 26and deployment of the Green Alert Awareness Program and   SB1674- 7 -LRB104 11983 RTM 22077 b1toolkit on or before July 1, 2027. 2    (3) The Illinois State Police shall establish a Green 3Alert Task Force within 90 days after the effective date of 4this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly to assist 5the development and deployment of the Green Alert Awareness 6Program and toolkit. The Task Force shall establish the 7criteria and create a toolkit, which may include usage of 8Department of Transportation signs, under Section 2705-505.6 9of the Department of Transportation Law of the Civil 10Administrative Code of Illinois. The Task Force shall monitor 11and review the implementation and operation of that program, 12including procedures, budgetary requirements, standards, and 13minimum requirements for the training of law enforcement 14personnel on how to interact appropriately and effectively 15with veterans or other active or retired service members that 16are believed to be at risk of being hurt or hurting themselves. 17The Task Force shall also develop additional network and 18financial resources for use in the system. The Task Force 19shall include, but shall not be limited to, one representative 20from each of the following:21        (A) the Illinois State Police;22        (B) the Department of Veterans Affairs;23        (C) the Department of Public Health;24        25        (D) the Law Enforcement Training Standards Board;26        (E) the Emergency Management Agency and Office of   SB1674- 8 -LRB104 11983 RTM 22077 b1    Homeland Security;2        (F) the Secretary of State;3        (G) the Department of Transportation;4        (H) the Department of the Lottery;5        (I) the Illinois Toll Highway Authority;6        (J) the Illinois Association of County Veterans 7    Assistance Commissions; 8        (K) a State association dedicated to post traumatic 9    stress disorder care, support, and research;10        (L) a State organization dedicated to improving 11    quality of life for veterans, active service members, 12    Illinois National Guard Members, and reservists;13        (M) a State group of area agencies involved in 14    planning and coordinating services and programs for 15    veterans, active service members, Illinois National Guard 16    Members, and reservists in their respective areas;17        (N) a State organization dedicated to enhancing 18    communication and cooperation between sheriffs;19        (O) a State association of police chiefs and other 20    leaders of police and public safety organizations;21        (P) a State association representing Illinois 22    publishers; 23        (Q) a State association that advocates for the 24    broadcast industry; 25        (R) a member of a large wireless telephone carrier; 26    and  SB1674- 9 -LRB104 11983 RTM 22077 b1        (S) a member of a small wireless telephone carrier.2    The members of the Task Force designated in subparagraphs 3(A) through (J) of this paragraph (3) shall be appointed by the 4head of the respective agency. The members of the Task Force 5designated in subparagraphs (K) through (S) of this paragraph 6(3) shall be appointed by the Director of the Illinois State 7Police. The Director of the Illinois State Police or the 8Director's designee shall serve as Chair of the Task Force. 9    The Task Force shall meet at least twice a year and shall 10provide a report on the operations of the Green Alert Program 11to the General Assembly and the Governor each year by June 1230th. 13    (4) Subject to appropriation, the Illinois State Police, 14in coordination with the Department of Veterans Affairs and 15the Green Alert Task Force, shall develop and implement, on or 16before January 1, 2027, a community outreach program to 17promote awareness of the Green Alert Program as part of the 18Endangered Missing Person Advisory among law enforcement 19agencies, the State's healthcare facilities, veterans' homes, 20other agencies and facilities tasked with providing support to 21veterans, and the general population.22    (5) The Child Safety Coordinator, created under Section 232605-480 of this Law, shall act in the capacity of Child Safety 24Coordinator, Endangered Missing Person Coordinator, and Green 25Alert Program Coordinator. The Coordinator, in conjunction 26with the members of the Task Force, shall assist the   SB1674- 10 -LRB104 11983 RTM 22077 b1Department and the Green Alert Task Force in the establishment 2of State standards and monitor the availability of federal and 3private funding that may become available to further the 4objectives of the Endangered Missing Person Advisory and Green 5Alert Awareness Program. The Department shall provide 6technical assistance for the Coordinator from its existing 7resources. 8    (6) The Illinois State Police shall provide administrative 9and other support to the Task Force. 10(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 11    Section 10. The Illinois Police Training Act is amended by 12changing Section 10.10 as follows: 13    (50 ILCS 705/10.10)14    Sec. 10.10. Training in child abduction, and missing 15endangered senior alert system, missing endangered veterans 16alert system. 17    (a) The Board shall conduct training programs for law 18enforcement personnel of local governmental agencies in the 19statewide coordinated child abduction alert system developed 20under Section 2605-480 of the Illinois State Police Law of the 21Civil Administrative Code of Illinois and the statewide 22coordinated missing endangered senior alert system developed 23under Section 2605-375 of the Illinois State Police Law of the 24Civil Administrative Code of Illinois.  SB1674- 11 -LRB104 11983 RTM 22077 b1    (b) The Board shall conduct a training program for law 2enforcement personnel of local governmental agencies in the 3statewide Alzheimer's disease, other related dementia, or 4other dementia-like cognitive impairment coordinated Silver 5Search Awareness Program and toolkit developed under Section 62605-485 of the Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 7Administrative Code of Illinois. The Board shall adopt written 8protocols and guidelines for the handling of missing persons 9cases involving Alzheimer's disease, other related dementia, 10or other dementia-like cognitive impairment based upon 11protocols developed by the Silver Search Task Force in 12conjunction with the Illinois State Police on or before July 131, 2016. 14    (c) The Board shall conduct a training program for law 15enforcement personnel of local governmental agencies in the 16statewide coordinated Green Alert Awareness Program and 17toolkit developed under Section 2605-485 of the Illinois State 18Police Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. The 19Board shall adopt written protocols and guidelines for the 20handling of missing persons cases concerning veterans, active 21service members, Illinois National Guard Members, or 22reservists that are missing or believed to be at risk of being 23hurt or hurting themselves based upon protocols developed by 24the Green Alert Task Force in conjunction with the Illinois 25State Police on or before July 1, 2026. 26(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.)  SB1674- 12 -LRB104 11983 RTM 22077 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    20 ILCS 2605/2605-4854    50 ILCS 705/10.10